Utah statutes.
53A-17a-133.   State-supported voted leeway program authorized -- Election
requirements -- State guarantee -- Reconsideration of the program.
(1)  An election to consider adoption or modification of a voted leeway
program is required if initiative petitions signed by 10% of the number of
electors who voted at the last preceding general election are presented to the
local school board or by action of the board.
(2) (a) (i)  To establish a voted leeway program, a majority of the electors
of a district voting at an election in the manner set forth in Section
53A-16-110 must vote in favor of a special tax.
(ii)  The tax rate may not exceed .002 per dollar of taxable value.
(b)  The district may maintain a school program which exceeds the cost of the
program referred to in Section 53A-17a-145 with this voted leeway.
(c)  In order to receive state support the first year, a district must receive
voter approval no later than December 1 of the year prior to implementation.
(3) (a)  Under the voted leeway program, the state shall contribute an amount
sufficient to guarantee $25.25 per weighted pupil unit for each .0001 of the
first .0016 per dollar of taxable value.
(b)  The same dollar amount guarantee per weighted pupil unit for the .0016
per dollar of taxable value under Subsection (3)(a) shall apply to the board-
approved leeway authorized in Section 53A-17a-134, so that the guarantee shall
apply up to a total of .002 per dollar of taxable value if a school district
levies a tax rate under both programs.
(c)  Beginning July 1, 2011, the $25.25 guarantee under Subsections (3)(a) and
(b) shall be indexed each year to the value of the weighted pupil unit by
making the value of the guarantee equal to.010544 times the value of the prior
year's weighted pupil unit.
(d) (i)  The amount of state guarantee money to which a school district would
otherwise be entitled to under this Subsection (3) may not be reduced for the
sole reason that the district's levy is reduced as a consequence of changes in
the certified tax rate under Section 59-2-924 pursuant to changes in property
valuation.
(ii)  Subsection (3)(d)(i) applies for a period of five years following any
such change in the certified tax rate.
(e)  The guarantee provided under this section does not apply to the portion
of a voted leeway rate that exceeds the voted leeway rate that was in effect
for the previous fiscal year, unless an increase in the voted leeway rate was
authorized in an election conducted on or after July 1 of the previous fiscal
year and before December 2 of the previous fiscal year.
(4) (a)  An election to modify an existing voted leeway program is not a
reconsideration of the existing program unless the proposition submitted to
the electors expressly so states.
(b)  A majority vote opposing a modification does not deprive the district of
authority to continue an existing program.
(c)  If adoption of a leeway program is contingent upon an offset reducing
other local school board levies, the board must allow the electors, in an
election, to consider modifying or discontinuing the program prior to a
subsequent increase in other levies that would increase the total local school
board levy.
(d)  Nothing contained in this section terminates, without an election, the
authority of a school district to continue an existing voted leeway program
previously authorized by the voters.
(5)  Notwithstanding Section 59-2-919, a school district may budget an
increased amount of ad valorem property tax revenue derived from a voted
leeway imposed under this section in addition to revenue from new growth as
defined in Subsection 59-2-924(4), without having to comply with the notice
requirements of Section 59-2-919, if:
(a)  the voted leeway is approved:
(i)  in accordance with Section 53A-16-110 on or after January 1, 2003; and
(ii)  within the four-year period immediately preceding the year in which the
school district seeks to budget an increased amount of ad valorem property tax
revenue derived from the voted leeway; and
(b)  for a voted leeway approved or modified in accordance with this section
on or after January 1, 2009, the school district complies with the
requirements of Subsection (7).
(6)  Notwithstanding Section 59-2-919, a school district may levy a tax rate
under this section that exceeds the certified tax rate without having to
comply with the notice requirements of Section 59-2-919 if:
(a)  the levy exceeds the certified tax rate as the result of a school
district budgeting an increased amount of ad valorem property tax revenue
derived from a voted leeway imposed under this section;
(b)  the voted leeway was approved:
(i)  in accordance with Section 53A-16-110 on or after January 1, 2003; and
(ii)  within the four-year period immediately preceding the year in which the
school district seeks to budget an increased amount of ad valorem property tax
revenue derived from the voted leeway; and
(c)  for a voted leeway approved or modified in accordance with this section
on or after January 1, 2009, the school district complies with requirements of
Subsection (7).
(7)  For purposes of Subsection (5)(b) or (6)(c), the proposition submitted to
the electors regarding the adoption or modification of a voted leeway program
shall contain the following statement:
"A vote in favor of this tax means that (name of the school district) may
increase revenue from this property tax without advertising the increase for
the next five years."
